Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0659, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Personal care assistance services; covered services. (a) The personal care assistance services eligible for payment include services and supports furnished to an individual, as needed, to assist in: (1) activities of daily living; (2) health-related procedures and tasks; (3) observation and redirection of behaviors; and (4) instrumental activities of daily living. (b) Activities of daily living include the following covered services: (1) dressing, including assistance with choosing, application, and changing of clothing and application of special appliances, wraps, or clothing; (2) grooming, including assistance with basic hair care, oral care, shaving, applying cosmetics and deodorant, and care of eyeglasses and hearing aids. Nail care is included, except for recipients who are diabetic or have poor circulation; (3) bathing, including assistance with basic personal hygiene and skin care; (4) eating, including assistance with hand washing and application of orthotics required for eating, transfers, and feeding; (5) transfers, including assistance with transferring the recipient from one seating or reclining area to another; (6) mobility, including assistance with ambulation, including use of a wheelchair. Mobility does not include providing transportation for a recipient; (7) positioning, including assistance with positioning or turning a recipient for necessary care and comfort; and (8) toileting, including assistance with helping recipient with bowel or bladder elimination and care including transfers, mobility, positioning, feminine hygiene, use of toileting equipment or supplies, cleansing the perineal area, inspection of the skin, and adjusting clothing. (c) Health-related procedures and tasks include the following covered services: (1) range of motion and passive exercise to maintain a recipient's strength and muscle functioning; (2) assistance with self-administered medication as defined by this section, including reminders to take medication, bringing medication to the recipient, and assistance with opening medication under the direction of the recipient or responsible party, including medications given through a nebulizer; (3) interventions for seizure disorders, including monitoring and observation; and (4) other activities considered within the scope of the personal care service and meeting the definition of health-related procedures and tasks under this section. (d) A personal care assistant may provide health-related procedures and tasks associated with the complex health-related needs of a recipient if the procedures and tasks meet the definition of health-related procedures and tasks under this section and the personal care assistant is trained by a qualified professional and demonstrates competency to safely complete the procedures and tasks. Delegation of health-related procedures and tasks and all training must be documented in the personal care assistance care plan and the recipient's and personal care assistant's files. A personal care assistant must not determine the medication dose or time for medicationnew text begin , unless the requirements under paragraph (f) are metnew text end . (e) deleted text begin Effective January 1, 2010,deleted text end For a personal care assistant to provide the health-related procedures and tasks of tracheostomy suctioning and services to recipients on ventilator support there must be: (1) delegation and training by a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, licensed respiratory therapist, physician assistant, or physician; (2) utilization of clean rather than sterile procedure; (3) specialized training about the health-related procedures and tasks and equipment, including ventilator operation and maintenance; (4) individualized training regarding the needs of the recipient; and (5) supervision by a qualified professional who is a registered nurse. new text begin (f) For a personal care assistant to provide the health-related procedure and task of medication injection to a recipient, the following requirements must be met: new text end new text begin (1) a registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse delegates this task and provides training to the personal care assistant; new text end new text begin (2) the personal care assistant receives individualized training regarding the needs of the recipient; and new text end new text begin (3) the personal care assistant is supervised by a qualified professional who is a registered nurse. new text end deleted text begin (f) Effective January 1, 2010,deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A personal care assistant may observe and redirect the recipient for episodes where there is a need for redirection due to behaviors. Training of the personal care assistant must occur based on the needs of the recipient, the personal care assistance care plan, and any other support services provided. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end Instrumental activities of daily living under subdivision 1, paragraph (i). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon federal approval. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0659, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Noncovered personal care assistance services. (a) Personal care assistance services are not eligible for medical assistance payment under this section when provided: (1) by the recipient's spouse, parent of a recipient under the age of 18, paid legal guardian, licensed foster provider, except as allowed under section 256B.0652, subdivision 10, or responsible party; (2) in order to meet staffing or license requirements in a residential or child care setting; (3) solely as a child care or babysitting service; or (4) without authorization by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. (b) The following personal care services are not eligible for medical assistance payment under this section when provided in residential settings: (1) when the provider of home care services who is not related by blood, marriage, or adoption owns or otherwise controls the living arrangement, including licensed or unlicensed services; or (2) when personal care assistance services are the responsibility of a residential or program license holder under the terms of a service agreement and administrative rules. (c) Other specific tasks not covered under paragraph (a) or (b) that are not eligible for medical assistance reimbursement for personal care assistance services under this section include: (1) sterile procedures; (2) injections of fluids and medications into veins, muscles, or skinnew text begin , except when the requirements of subdivision 2, paragraph (f), are metnew text end ; (3) home maintenance or chore services; (4) homemaker services not an integral part of assessed personal care assistance services needed by a recipient; (5) application of restraints or implementation of procedures under section 245.825; (6) instrumental activities of daily living for children under the age of 18, except when immediate attention is needed for health or hygiene reasons integral to the personal care services and the need is listed in the service plan by the assessor; and (7) assessments for personal care assistance services by personal care assistance provider agencies or by independently enrolled registered nurses. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon federal approval. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.85, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section and section 256B.851, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given. (b) "Activities of daily living" or "ADLs" means: (1) dressing, including assistance with choosing, applying, and changing clothing and applying special appliances, wraps, or clothing; (2) grooming, including assistance with basic hair care, oral care, shaving, applying cosmetics and deodorant, and care of eyeglasses and hearing aids. Grooming includes nail care, except for recipients who are diabetic or have poor circulation; (3) bathing, including assistance with basic personal hygiene and skin care; (4) eating, including assistance with hand washing and applying orthotics required for eating or feeding; (5) transfers, including assistance with transferring the participant from one seating or reclining area to another; (6) mobility, including assistance with ambulation and use of a wheelchair. Mobility does not include providing transportation for a participant; (7) positioning, including assistance with positioning or turning a participant for necessary care and comfort; and (8) toileting, including assistance with bowel or bladder elimination and care, transfers, mobility, positioning, feminine hygiene, use of toileting equipment or supplies, cleansing the perineal area, inspection of the skin, and adjusting clothing. (c) "Agency-provider model" means a method of CFSS under which a qualified agency provides services and supports through the agency's own employees and policies. The agency must allow the participant to have a significant role in the selection and dismissal of support workers of their choice for the delivery of their specific services and supports. (d) "Behavior" means a description of a need for services and supports used to determine the home care rating and additional service units. The presence of Level I behavior is used to determine the home care rating. (e) "Budget model" means a service delivery method of CFSS that allows the use of a service budget and assistance from a financial management services (FMS) provider for a participant to directly employ support workers and purchase supports and goods. (f) "Complex health-related needs" means an intervention listed in clauses (1) to (8) that has been ordered by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician's assistant and is specified in an assessment summary, including: (1) tube feedings requiring: (i) a gastrojejunostomy tube; or (ii) continuous tube feeding lasting longer than 12 hours per day; (2) wounds described as: (i) stage III or stage IV; (ii) multiple wounds; (iii) requiring sterile or clean dressing changes or a wound vac; or (iv) open lesions such as burns, fistulas, tube sites, or ostomy sites that require specialized care; (3) parenteral therapy described as: (i) IV therapy more than two times per week lasting longer than four hours for each treatment; or (ii) total parenteral nutrition (TPN) daily; (4) respiratory interventions, including: (i) oxygen required more than eight hours per day; (ii) respiratory vest more than one time per day; (iii) bronchial drainage treatments more than two times per day; (iv) sterile or clean suctioning more than six times per day; (v) dependence on another to apply respiratory ventilation augmentation devices such as BiPAP and CPAP; and (vi) ventilator dependence under section 256B.0651; (5) insertion and maintenance of catheter, including: (i) sterile catheter changes more than one time per month; (ii) clean intermittent catheterization, and including self-catheterization more than six times per day; or (iii) bladder irrigations; (6) bowel program more than two times per week requiring more than 30 minutes to perform each time; (7) neurological intervention, including: (i) seizures more than two times per week and requiring significant physical assistance to maintain safety; or (ii) swallowing disorders diagnosed by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician's assistant and requiring specialized assistance from another on a daily basis; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (8) medication injections if the following requirements are met: new text end new text begin (i) a registered nurse or advanced practice registered nurse delegates this task and provides training to the support worker; new text end new text begin (ii) the support worker receives individualized training regarding the needs of the participant; and new text end new text begin (iii) the support worker is supervised by a registered nurse; and new text end deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end other congenital or acquired diseases creating a need for significantly increased direct hands-on assistance and interventions in six to eight activities of daily living. (g) "Community first services and supports" or "CFSS" means the assistance and supports program under this section needed for accomplishing activities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living, and health-related tasks through hands-on assistance to accomplish the task or constant supervision and cueing to accomplish the task, or the purchase of goods as defined in subdivision 7, clause (3), that replace the need for human assistance. (h) "Community first services and supports service delivery plan" or "CFSS service delivery plan" means a written document detailing the services and supports chosen by the participant to meet assessed needs that are within the approved CFSS service authorization, as determined in subdivision 8. Services and supports are based on the support plan identified in sections 256B.092, subdivision 1b, and 256S.10. (i) "Consultation services" means assisting a participant in making informed choices about CFSS services in general and self-directed tasks in particular, and in developing a person-centered CFSS service delivery plan to achieve quality service outcomes. (j) "Critical activities of daily living" means transferring, mobility, eating, and toileting. (k) "Dependency" in activities of daily living means a person requires hands-on assistance or constant supervision and cueing to accomplish one or more of the activities of daily living every day or on the days during the week that the activity is performed; however, a child must not be found to be dependent in an activity of daily living if, because of the child's age, an adult would either perform the activity for the child or assist the child with the activity and the assistance needed is the assistance appropriate for a typical child of the same age. (l) "Extended CFSS" means CFSS services and supports provided under CFSS that are included in the CFSS service delivery plan through one of the home and community-based services waivers and as approved and authorized under chapter 256S and sections 256B.092, subdivision 5, and 256B.49, which exceed the amount, duration, and frequency of the state plan CFSS services for participants. Extended CFSS excludes the purchase of goods. (m) "Financial management services provider" or "FMS provider" means a qualified organization required for participants using the budget model under subdivision 13 that is an enrolled provider with the department to provide vendor fiscal/employer agent financial management services (FMS). (n) "Health-related procedures and tasks" means procedures and tasks related to the specific assessed health needs of a participant that can be taught or assigned by a state-licensed health care or mental health professional and performed by a support worker. (o) "Instrumental activities of daily living" means activities related to living independently in the community, including but not limited to: meal planning, preparation, and cooking; shopping for food, clothing, or other essential items; laundry; housecleaning; assistance with medications; managing finances; communicating needs and preferences during activities; arranging supports; and assistance with traveling around and participating in the community, including traveling to medical appointments. For purposes of this paragraph, traveling includes driving and accompanying the recipient in the recipient's chosen mode of transportation and according to the individual CFSS service delivery plan. (p) "Lead agency" has the meaning given in section 256B.0911, subdivision 10. (q) "Legal representative" means parent of a minor, a court-appointed guardian, or another representative with legal authority to make decisions about services and supports for the participant. Other representatives with legal authority to make decisions include but are not limited to a health care agent or an attorney-in-fact authorized through a health care directive or power of attorney. (r) "Level I behavior" means physical aggression toward self or others or destruction of property that requires the immediate response of another person. (s) "Medication assistance" means providing verbal or visual reminders to take regularly scheduled medication, and includes any of the following supports listed in clauses (1) to (3) and other types of assistance, except that a support worker must not determine medication dose or time for medication or inject medications into veins, muscles, or skinnew text begin unless the requirements under paragraph (f), clause (8), are metnew text end : (1) under the direction of the participant or the participant's representative, bringing medications to the participant including medications given through a nebulizer, opening a container of previously set-up medications, emptying the container into the participant's hand, opening and giving the medication in the original container to the participant, or bringing to the participant liquids or food to accompany the medication; (2) organizing medications as directed by the participant or the participant's representative; and (3) providing verbal or visual reminders to perform regularly scheduled medications. (t) "Participant" means a person who is eligible for CFSS. (u) "Participant's representative" means a parent, family member, advocate, or other adult authorized by the participant or participant's legal representative, if any, to serve as a representative in connection with the provision of CFSS. If the participant is unable to assist in the selection of a participant's representative, the legal representative shall appoint one. (v) "Person-centered planning process" means a process that is directed by the participant to plan for CFSS services and supports. (w) "Service budget" means the authorized dollar amount used for the budget model or for the purchase of goods. (x) "Shared services" means the provision of CFSS services by the same CFSS support worker to two or three participants who voluntarily enter into a written agreement to receive services at the same time, in the same setting, and through the same agency-provider or FMS provider. (y) "Support worker" means a qualified and trained employee of the agency-provider as required by subdivision 11b or of the participant employer under the budget model as required by subdivision 14 who has direct contact with the participant and provides services as specified within the participant's CFSS service delivery plan. (z) "Unit" means the increment of service based on hours or minutes identified in the service agreement. (aa) "Vendor fiscal employer agent" means an agency that provides financial management services. (bb) "Wages and benefits" means the hourly wages and salaries, the employer's share of FICA taxes, Medicare taxes, state and federal unemployment taxes, workers' compensation, mileage reimbursement, health and dental insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, long-term care insurance, uniform allowance, contributions to employee retirement accounts, or other forms of employee compensation and benefits. (cc) "Worker training and development" means services provided according to subdivision 18a for developing workers' skills as required by the participant's individual CFSS service delivery plan that are arranged for or provided by the agency-provider or purchased by the participant employer. These services include training, education, direct observation and supervision, and evaluation and coaching of job skills and tasks, including supervision of health-related tasks or behavioral supports. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon federal approval. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.85, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Support workers requirements. (a) Support workers shall: (1) enroll with the department as a support worker after a background study under chapter 245C has been completed and the support worker has received a notice from the commissioner that the support worker: (i) is not disqualified under section 245C.14; or (ii) is disqualified, but has received a set-aside of the disqualification under section 245C.22; (2) have the ability to effectively communicate with the participant or the participant's representative; (3) have the skills and ability to provide the services and supports according to the participant's CFSS service delivery plan and respond appropriately to the participant's needs; (4) complete the basic standardized CFSS training as determined by the commissioner before completing enrollment. The training must be available in languages other than English and to those who need accommodations due to disabilities. CFSS support worker training must include successful completion of the following training components: basic first aid, vulnerable adult, child maltreatment, OSHA universal precautions, basic roles and responsibilities of support workers including information about basic body mechanics, emergency preparedness, orientation to positive behavioral practices, orientation to responding to a mental health crisis, fraud issues, time cards and documentation, and an overview of person-centered planning and self-direction. Upon completion of the training components, the support worker must pass the certification test to provide assistance to participants; (5) complete employer-directed training and orientation on the participant's individual needs; (6) maintain the privacy and confidentiality of the participant; and (7) not independently determine the medication dose or time for medications for the participantnew text begin , unless the requirements of subdivision 2, paragraph (f), clause (8), are metnew text end . (b) The commissioner may deny or terminate a support worker's provider enrollment and provider number if the support worker: (1) does not meet the requirements in paragraph (a); (2) fails to provide the authorized services required by the employer; (3) has been intoxicated by alcohol or drugs while providing authorized services to the participant or while in the participant's home; (4) has manufactured or distributed drugs while providing authorized services to the participant or while in the participant's home; or (5) has been excluded as a provider by the commissioner of human services, or by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Inspector General, from participation in Medicaid, Medicare, or any other federal health care program. (c) A support worker may appeal in writing to the commissioner to contest the decision to terminate the support worker's provider enrollment and provider number. (d) A support worker must not provide or be paid for more than 310 hours of CFSS per month, regardless of the number of participants the support worker serves or the number of agency-providers or participant employers by which the support worker is employed. The department shall not disallow the number of hours per day a support worker works unless it violates other law. (e) CFSS qualify for an enhanced rate or budget if the support worker providing the services: (1) provides services, within the scope of CFSS described in subdivision 7, to a participant who qualifies for ten or more hours per day of CFSS; and (2) satisfies the current requirements of Medicare for training and competency or competency evaluation of home health aides or nursing assistants, as provided in the Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 483.151 or 484.36, or alternative state-approved training or competency requirements. This paragraph expires upon the effective date of paragraph (f). (f) Effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, CFSS qualify for an enhanced rate or budget if the support worker providing the services: (1) provides services, within the scope of CFSS described in subdivision 7, to a participant who qualifies for ten or more hours per day of CFSS; and (2) satisfies the current requirements of Medicare for training and competency or competency evaluation of home health aides or nursing assistants, as provided in the Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 483.151 or 484.36, or alternative state-approved training or competency requirements. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon federal approval. new text end